New Jersey, session 222, A3031.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   a. As used in this section: Animal pollinator means any bee, butterfly, moth, wasp, fly, beetle, ant, hummingbird, bat, or animal that is known to pollinate plants. Closed landfill means any legacy landfill or closed sanitary landfill facility, as defined in section 1 of P.L.2013, c.69 (C.13:1E-125.1). b.   The Department of Environmental Protection shall within its existing budget establish a program to encourage the owner or operator of any closed landfill to transform the landfill into habitat that supports animal pollinators using native plants where possible.  The department shall create guidelines and best practices for establishing and maintaining pollinator habitat on a closed landfill no later than six months after the effective date of this act. c.   The department shall seek and encourage corporate sponsorship and non-profit partnerships for the creation and maintenance of pollinator habitat on closed landfills. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.